lexc/noun/enhufnige.lexc
!!!enhu2.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Noun[gcat] +Pref+

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem 
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc[lfea] +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub  +Sup +Ter
!+Sue
      
§EOA§ §uue§ §OEOE1§ §J§ §UUE§ §OEOE§ §JP§ §AE§ §OEOE2§
§UUE1§ §oeoez1§ §oooe§ §oeoez2§ §ooez3§ §AAA§ §oeoe§ §AA§ §oeoez§ §AE1§ §Jnull§ §JPnull§
§VV§ §b§ §h§ §k§ §n§ §r§ §t§ 

LEXICON Root
Prefigekoto;

LEXICON Prefigekoto
+Pref+:keresztül   Noun;
+Pref+:kölcsön   Noun;
+Pref+:széjjel   Noun;
+Pref+:szembe   Noun;
+Pref+:szerte   Noun;
+Pref+:vissza   Noun;
+Pref+:helyre   Noun;
+Pref+:tovább   Noun;
+Pref+:tönkre   Noun;
+Pref+:észre   Noun;
+Pref+:rajta   Noun;
+Pref+:előre   Noun;
+Pref+:félbe   Noun;
+Pref+:félre   Noun;
+Pref+:felül   Noun;
+Pref+:fölül   Noun;
+Pref+:agyon   Noun;
+Pref+:ellen   Noun;
+Pref+:körbe   Noun;
+Pref+:körül   Noun;
+Pref+:közbe   Noun;
+Pref+:közre   Noun;
+Pref+:külön   Noun;
+Pref+:utána   Noun;
+Pref+:végbe   Noun;
+Pref+:végig   Noun;
+Pref+:hátra   Noun;
+Pref+:hozzá   Noun;
+Pref+:egybe   Noun;
+Pref+:ketté   Noun;
+Pref+:össze   Noun;
+Pref+:mellé   Noun;
+Pref+:által   Noun;
+Pref+:alul   Noun;
+Pref+:haza   Noun;
+Pref+:újra   Noun;
+Pref+:abba   Noun;
+Pref+:neki   Noun;
+Pref+:bele   Noun;
+Pref+:újjá   Noun;
+Pref+:benn   Noun;
+Pref+:fenn   Noun;
+Pref+:fönn   Noun;
+Pref+:jóvá   Noun;
+Pref+:szét   Noun;
+Pref+:tele   Noun;
+Pref+:tova   Noun;
+Pref+:meg   Noun;
+Pref+:oda   Noun;
+Pref+:elő   Noun;
+Pref+:túl   Noun;
+Pref+:alá   Noun;
+Pref+:föl   Noun;
+Pref+:ide   Noun;
+Pref+:fel   Noun;
+Pref+:rá   Noun;
+Pref+:ki   Noun;
+Pref+:le   Noun;
+Pref+:el   Noun;
+Pref+:át   Noun;
+Pref+:be   Noun;
            Noun;


LEXICON AddNoun
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Poss
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or           #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON Plur
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Gen;
                            Gen;
        
LEXICON Fam
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen;

LEXICON Gen
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;
 
LEXICON Case
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or           #;    ! kor

!lépés:lépt
LEXICON AddNounlepes
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Posslepes;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plurlepes;

LEXICON Posslepes
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Famlepes;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Famlepes;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§Jnull§§AE1§   Famlepes;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famlepes;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Famlepes;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§Jnull§§UUE1§k   Famlepes;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPnull§§AE§im   Famlepes;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPnull§§AE§id   Famlepes;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPnull§§AE§i   Famlepes;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPnull§§AE§ink   Famlepes;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPnull§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famlepes;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPnull§§AE§ik   Famlepes;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
!                           Caselepes;

LEXICON Plurlepes
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Genlepes;
!                            Genlepes;
        
LEXICON Famlepes
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genlepes;
                       Genlepes;


LEXICON Genlepes
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caselepes;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caselepes;
                       Caselepes;
 
LEXICON Caselepes
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or           #;    ! kor



!LEXICON AddNouneej
![stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Caseeej;

!LEXICON Caseeej
!+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§AA§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t

LEXICON Noun
acélvázasítás AddNoun;
affinulás AddNoun;
agyatlanítás AddNoun;
akarattalanítás AddNoun;
aktívodás AddNoun;
alapulás AddNoun;
alkoholosítás AddNoun;
alterálás AddNoun;
amatőrködés AddNoun;
angolellenesedés AddNoun;
antikolás AddNoun;
applikálás AddNoun;
arcátlanodás AddNoun;
aszimptotikusodás AddNoun;
autózás AddNoun;
babrásulás AddNoun;
balkezesedés AddNoun;
barikádozás AddNoun;
bazseválás AddNoun;
benediktinusítás AddNoun;
betűsorosítás AddNoun;
billegetés AddNoun;
bizalmasítás AddNoun;
bliccelés AddNoun;
bodzásítás AddNoun;
bokszolás AddNoun;
bolyongás AddNoun;
bordázás AddNoun;
borzaskodás AddNoun;
botlasztás AddNoun;
bruttósítás AddNoun;
buktázás AddNoun;
butusítás AddNoun;
bámészkodás AddNoun;
béklyózás AddNoun;
bérmálás AddNoun;
bóvliztatás AddNoun;
búgatás AddNoun;
bürokratáskodás AddNoun;
bűbájosítás AddNoun;
cementeződés AddNoun;
cifrázatlanítás AddNoun;
cincálás AddNoun;
citromlevesezés AddNoun;
családiasodás AddNoun;
csatamezőzés AddNoun;
csehellenesedés AddNoun;
csendesülés AddNoun;
csettenés AddNoun;
csintalanítás AddNoun;
csonkolás AddNoun;
csábíthatóság AddNoun;
csökönyösködés AddNoun;
csüngés AddNoun;
dadogás AddNoun;
dehidrálódás AddNoun;
derítés AddNoun;
dielektromosítás AddNoun;
disznólkodás AddNoun;
dologiasítás AddNoun;
dugattyúzás AddNoun;
dátumozódás AddNoun;
döngicsélés AddNoun;
ebtelenítés AddNoun;
egyeződés AddNoun;
elegyedés AddNoun;
elvtársiasítás AddNoun;
emlegetés AddNoun;
eredményezés AddNoun;
esküdés AddNoun;
exorcizálás AddNoun;
fakasztás AddNoun;
fattyazás AddNoun;
fejfájósítás AddNoun;
felhabosodás AddNoun;
fertőzésmentesítés AddNoun;
fikázódás AddNoun;
fizetőképesítés AddNoun;
fogatlanság AddNoun;
foltosodás AddNoun;
formálatlanság AddNoun;
franciaellenesedés AddNoun;
futás AddNoun;
félhivatalosítás AddNoun;
fésülés AddNoun;
fúvás AddNoun;
fűlés AddNoun;
gebedés AddNoun;
golyvásítás AddNoun;
gubancolás AddNoun;
gyapjaskodás AddNoun;
gyámoltalankodás AddNoun;
gyülekezés AddNoun;
gázosítás AddNoun;
gúnyosítás AddNoun;
hajladozás AddNoun;
hallgatódzás AddNoun;
hangsúlytalanítás AddNoun;
hasonlítódás AddNoun;
hatásozás AddNoun;
helyezhetetlenség AddNoun;
hetedelés AddNoun;
hiresítés AddNoun;
honosítatlankodás AddNoun;
hullajtás AddNoun;
hágás AddNoun;
hátrálás AddNoun;
hólyagoztatás AddNoun;
hűtlenkedés AddNoun;
igazolódás AddNoun;
illetés AddNoun;
inficiálás AddNoun;
intés AddNoun;
irányítatlankodás AddNoun;
ivás AddNoun;
jelenetezés AddNoun;
juttatás AddNoun;
jövedelmezés AddNoun;
kalodázás AddNoun;
kapatás AddNoun;
karimásítás AddNoun;
kazettázás AddNoun;
kelteződés AddNoun;
kereteztetés AddNoun;
kezelhetőség AddNoun;
kizárólagosítás AddNoun;
koldultatás AddNoun;
komprimálás AddNoun;
kontyolás AddNoun;
korcsosítás AddNoun;
kosarazás AddNoun;
kritikázás AddNoun;
kuplézgatás AddNoun;
kábítószerezés AddNoun;
kémlelődés AddNoun;
kéredzés AddNoun;
kíméletesítés AddNoun;
ködösítés AddNoun;
köpülés AddNoun;
kövesülés AddNoun;
kúrás AddNoun;
ladysítás AddNoun;
lapátozás AddNoun;
legátusság AddNoun;
leskelődés AddNoun;
linuxosítás AddNoun;
lopódzás AddNoun;
lábatlanodás AddNoun;
légmentesítés AddNoun;
lépés:lépt AddNounlepes;
lót-futás AddNoun;
magasítás AddNoun;
maliciózuskodás AddNoun;
maszatosítás AddNoun;
melózás AddNoun;
meszesedés AddNoun;
mintásítás AddNoun;
molyosodás AddNoun;
mosdatlanodás AddNoun;
multiplikálás AddNoun;
mámorítás AddNoun;
méregetés AddNoun;
múzeumozás AddNoun;
nappallás AddNoun;
nemzetietlenkedés AddNoun;
nobiliskodás AddNoun;
nyeldesés AddNoun;
nyitás AddNoun;
nyulászás AddNoun;
nádasulás AddNoun;
nútozás AddNoun;
oktálisodás AddNoun;
omlasztás AddNoun;
orzás AddNoun;
paffulás AddNoun;
paradigmatikuskodás AddNoun;
patentírozás AddNoun;
pendítés AddNoun;
pesztrálás AddNoun;
pipázgatás AddNoun;
plauzibilisedés AddNoun;
polimerizálódás AddNoun;
portugálelleneskedés AddNoun;
preparálódás AddNoun;
próbaidősítés AddNoun;
puklisítás AddNoun;
párolgás AddNoun;
pótlékozás AddNoun;
püffesztés AddNoun;
rakoncátlankodás AddNoun;
redőtlenítés AddNoun;
rekvirálás AddNoun;
repedés AddNoun;
revelálás AddNoun;
rinyálás AddNoun;
romantikuskodás AddNoun;
rothasztás AddNoun;
rágnivaló AddNoun;
részegülés AddNoun;
röpködés AddNoun;
sarcolás AddNoun;
sellakozás AddNoun;
sikkasztatás AddNoun;
skrupulózusodás AddNoun;
sorosítás AddNoun;
srégítés AddNoun;
stírölés AddNoun;
szabadkozás AddNoun;
szakralizálódás AddNoun;
szarvalás AddNoun;
szektariánuskodás AddNoun;
szemecskés AddNoun;
szentesülés AddNoun;
szerepezés AddNoun;
szidás AddNoun;
szippantózás AddNoun;
szoktatás AddNoun;
sztenderdizálás AddNoun;
szurtoskodás AddNoun;
számláltatás AddNoun;
szászodás AddNoun;
szíjazás AddNoun;
szónokiasodás AddNoun;
szúrás AddNoun;
sárkányozás AddNoun;
sömörösítés AddNoun;
sütögetés AddNoun;
találgatás AddNoun;
tapintás AddNoun;
tatárkodás AddNoun;
teleltetés AddNoun;
teregetés AddNoun;
tervelgetés AddNoun;
tilalmazás AddNoun;
toccsanás AddNoun;
toppantgatás AddNoun;
trafikálás AddNoun;
tréfálódzás AddNoun;
turkálás AddNoun;
tápdúsodás AddNoun;
távolítódás AddNoun;
tétlenedés AddNoun;
tömés AddNoun;
töröködés AddNoun;
türtőztetés AddNoun;
ugrasztás AddNoun;
untatás AddNoun;
vackolódás AddNoun;
valósulhatatlanság AddNoun;
vegzálás AddNoun;
verítékezés AddNoun;
vezetés AddNoun;
villamosozás AddNoun;
viselés AddNoun;
vizsgáztatás AddNoun;
vágyódás AddNoun;
váltságosítás AddNoun;
véghetetlenedés AddNoun;
vételezhetőség AddNoun;
zakatolás AddNoun;
zsebelés AddNoun;
zsíroskodás AddNoun;
zökkenőmentesítés AddNoun;
ágazgatás AddNoun;
álmatlankodás AddNoun;
árusítás AddNoun;
ékezettelenítés AddNoun;
ércesítés AddNoun;
érvényesülés AddNoun;
ítéltetés AddNoun;
öklözgetés AddNoun;
öntözgetés AddNoun;
ösztönződés AddNoun;
ügetés AddNoun;
ütemeződés AddNoun;
